Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1803
Purchasing slaughter livestock; unlawful acts.

After December 25, 1969, it shall be unlawful for any person engaged in the business of purchasing slaughter livestock to:

(1) Purchase slaughter livestock when insolvent; or

(2) Neglect, before the close of the next business day following the purchase of slaughter livestock or within twenty-four hours following the determination of the purchase price, whichever may occur last, to remit to the seller or his representative the full amount of the purchase cost; Provided, that this section does not require payment in lieu of an express agreement to the contrary.

Laws 1969, c. 448, § 3, p. 1500.